North Carolina statutes. Chapter 97. Workers’ Compensation Act.
Article 1. Workers’ Compensation Act.
§ 97-18.
Prompt payment of compensation required; installments; payment without prejudice; notice to Commission; penalties.

Compensation under this Article shall be paid periodically, promptly and directly to the person entitled thereto unless otherwise specifically provided.

When the employer or insurer admits the employee’s right to compensation, the first installment of compensation payable by the employer shall become due on the fourteenth day after the employer has written or actual notice of the injury or death, on which date all compensation then due shall be paid. Compensation thereafter shall be paid in installments weekly except where the Commission determines that payment in installments should be made monthly or at some other period. Upon paying the first installment of compensation and upon suspending, reinstating, changing, or modifying such compensation for any cause, the insurer shall immediately notify the Commission, on a form prescribed by the Commission, that compensation has begun, or has been suspended, reinstated, changed, or modified. A copy of each notice shall be provided to the employee. The first notice of payment to the Commission shall contain the date and nature of the injury, the average weekly wages of the employee, the weekly compensation rate, the date the disability resulting from the injury began, and the date compensation commenced.

If the employer or insurer denies the employee’s right to compensation, the employer or insurer shall notify the Commission, on or before the fourteenth day after it has written or actual notice of the injury or death, or within such reasonable additional time as the Commission may allow, and advise the employee in writing of its refusal to pay compensation on a form prescribed by the Commission. This notification shall (i) include the name of the employee, the name of the employer, the date of the alleged injury or death, the insurer on the risk, if any, and a detailed statement of the grounds upon which the right to compensation is denied, and (ii) advise the employee of the employee’s right to request a hearing pursuant to

G.S. 97-83

. If the employer or insurer, in good faith, is without sufficient information to admit the employee’s right to compensation, the employer or insurer may deny the employee’s right to compensation.

In any claim for compensation in which the employer or insurer is uncertain on reasonable grounds whether the claim is compensable or whether it has liability for the claim under this Article, the employer or insurer may initiate compensation payments without prejudice and without admitting liability. The initial payment shall be accompanied by a form prescribed by and filed with the Commission, stating that the payments are being made without prejudice. Payments made pursuant to this subsection may continue until the employer or insurer contests or accepts liability for the claim or 90 days from the date the employer has written or actual notice of the injury or death, whichever occurs first, unless an extension is granted pursuant to this section. Prior to the expiration of the 90-day period, the employer or insurer may upon reasonable grounds apply to the Commission for an extension of not more than 30 days. The initiation of payment does not affect the right of the employer or insurer to continue to investigate or deny the compensability of the claim or its liability therefor during this period. If at any time during the 90-day period or extension thereof, the employer or insurer contests the compensability of the claim or its liability therefor, it may suspend payment of compensation and shall promptly notify the Commission and the employee on a form prescribed by the Commission. The employer or insurer must provide on the prescribed form a detailed statement of its grounds for denying compensability of the claim or its liability therefor. If the employer or insurer does not contest the compensability of the claim or its liability therefor within 90 days from the date it first has written or actual notice of the injury or death, or within such additional period as may be granted by the Commission, it waives the right to contest the compensability of and its liability for the claim under this Article. However, the employer or insurer may contest the compensability of or its liability for the claim after the 90-day period or extension thereof when it can show that material evidence was discovered after that period that could not have been reasonably discovered earlier, in which event the employer or insurer may terminate or suspend compensation subject to the provisions of

G.S. 97-18.1

.

The first installment of compensation payable under the terms of an award by the Commission, or under the terms of a judgment of the court upon an appeal from such an award, shall become due 10 days from the day following expiration of the time for appeal from the award or judgment or the day after notice waiving the right of appeal by all parties has been received by the Commission, whichever is sooner. Thereafter compensation shall be paid in installments weekly, except where the Commission determines that payment in installments shall be made monthly or in some other manner.

The employer’s or insurer’s grounds for contesting the employee’s claim or its liability therefor as specified in the notice suspending compensation under subsection (d) of this section are the only bases for the employer’s or insurer’s defense on the issue of compensability in a subsequent proceeding, unless the defense is based on newly discovered material evidence that could not reasonably have been discovered prior to the notice suspending compensation.

If any installment of compensation is not paid within 14 days after it becomes due, there shall be added to such unpaid installment an amount equal to ten per centum (10%) thereof, which shall be paid at the same time as, but in addition to, such installment, unless such nonpayment is excused by the Commission after a showing by the employer that owing to conditions over which he had no control such installment could not be paid within the period prescribed for the payment.

Within 16 days after final payment of compensation has been made, the employer or insurer shall send to the Commission and the employee a notice, in accordance with a form prescribed by the Commission, stating that such final payment has been made, the total amount of compensation paid, the name of the employee and of any other person to whom compensation has been paid, the date of the injury or death, and the date to which compensation has been paid. If the employer or insurer fails to so notify the Commission or the employee within such time, the Commission shall assess against such employer or insurer a civil penalty in the amount of twenty-five dollars ($25.00). The clear proceeds of civil penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

If any bill for services rendered under

G.S. 97-25

by any provider of health care is not paid within 60 days after it has been approved by the Commission and returned to the responsible party, or within 60 days after it was properly submitted, in accordance with the provisions of this Article, to an insurer or managed care organization responsible for direct reimbursement pursuant to G.S. 97-26(g), there shall be added to such unpaid bill an amount equal to ten per centum (10%) thereof, which shall be paid at the same time as, but in addition to, such medical bill, unless such late payment is excused by the Commission.

The employer or insurer shall promptly investigate each injury reported or known to the employer and at the earliest practicable time shall admit or deny the employee’s right to compensation or commence payment of compensation as provided in subsections (b), (c), or (d) of this section. When an employee files a claim for compensation with the Commission, the Commission may order reasonable sanctions against an employer or insurer which does not, within 30 days following notice from the Commission of the filing of a claim, or within such reasonable additional time as the Commission may allow, do one of the following:

Notify the Commission and the employee in writing that it is admitting the employee’s right to compensation and, if applicable, satisfy the requirements for payment of compensation under subsection (b) of this section.

Notify the Commission and the employee that it denies the employee’s right to compensation consistent with subsection (c) of this section.

Initiate payments without prejudice and without liability and satisfy the requirements of subsection (d) of this section.

For purposes of this subsection, reasonable sanctions shall not prohibit the employer or insurer from contesting the compensability of or its liability for the claim.

In addition to any other methods for reinstatement of compensation available under the Act, whenever the employer or insurer has admitted the employee’s right to compensation, or liability has been established, the employee may move for reinstatement of compensation on a form prescribed by the Commission. The form prescribed by the Commission shall contain the reasons for the proposed reinstatement of compensation, be supported by available documentation, and inform the employer of the employer’s right to contest the reinstatement of compensation by filing an objection in writing with the Commission within 14 days of the date the employee’s notice is filed with the Commission or within such additional reasonable time as the Commission may allow. If the employer or insurer contests the employee’s request for reinstatement, the Commission shall conduct an informal hearing by telephone with the parties or their counsel. If either party objects to conducting the hearing by telephone, the Commission may conduct the hearing in person in Raleigh or at another location selected by the Commission. The parties shall be afforded an opportunity to state their position and to submit documentary evidence at the informal hearing. The employee may waive the right to an informal hearing and proceed to the formal hearing. The Commission’s decision in the informal hearing is not binding in the subsequent hearings. If the application for Reinstatement of Payment of Disability Compensation is approved or not contested, then compensation shall be reinstated immediately and continue until further order of the Commission. The employer or employee may request a formal hearing pursuant to

G.S. 97-83

on the Commission’s decision approving or denying the employee’s application for reinstatement. A formal hearing under

G.S. 97-83

ordered or requested pursuant to this subsection shall be a hearing de novo on the employee’s application for reinstatement of compensation and may be scheduled by the Commission on a preemptive basis. This subsection shall not apply to a request for a review of an award on the grounds of a change in condition pursuant to

G.S. 97-47

.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 181/2; 1967, c. 1229, s. 2; 1979, c. 249, ss. 1, 2; c. 599; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 3.1; 1998-215, s. 114; 2005-448, s. 4; 2006-264, s. 91.7; 2011-287, s. 5; 2013-294, s. 3.

§ 97-18.1.
Termination or suspension of compensation benefits.

Payments of compensation pursuant to an award of the Commission shall continue until the terms of the award have been fully satisfied.

An employer may terminate payment of compensation for total disability being paid pursuant to

G.S. 97-29

when the employee has returned to work for the same or a different employer, subject to the provisions of

G.S. 97-32.1

, or when the employer contests a claim pursuant to G.S. 97-18(d) within the time allowed thereunder. The employer shall promptly notify the Commission and the employee, on a form prescribed by the Commission, of the termination of compensation and the availability of trial return to work and additional compensation due the employee for any partial disability.

An employer seeking to terminate or suspend compensation being paid pursuant to

G.S. 97-29

for a reason other than those specified in subsection (b) of this section shall notify the employee and the employee’s attorney of record in writing of its intent to do so on a form prescribed by the Commission. A copy of the notice shall be filed with the Commission. This form shall contain the reasons for the proposed termination or suspension of compensation, be supported by available documentation, and inform the employee of the employee’s right to contest the termination or suspension by filing an objection in writing with the Commission within 14 days of the date the employer’s notice is filed with the Commission or within such additional reasonable time as the Commission may allow.

If the employee fails to object to the employer’s notice of proposed termination or suspension within the time provided, the Commission may enter an appropriate order terminating or suspending the compensation if it finds that there is a sufficient basis under this Article for this action. If the employee files a timely objection to the employer’s notice, the Commission shall conduct an informal hearing by telephone with the parties or their counsel. If either party objects to conducting the hearing by telephone, the Commission may conduct the hearing in person in Raleigh or at another location selected by the Commission. The parties shall be afforded an opportunity to state their position and to submit documentary evidence at the informal hearing. The employer may waive the right to an informal hearing and proceed to the formal hearing. The informal hearing, whether by telephone or in person, shall be conducted only on the issue of termination or suspension of compensation and shall be conducted within 25 days of the receipt by the Commission of the employer’s notice to the employee unless this time is extended by the Commission for good cause. The Commission shall issue a decision on the employer’s application for termination of compensation within five days after completion of the informal hearing. The decision shall (i) approve the application, (ii) disapprove the application, or (iii) state that the Commission is unable to reach a decision on the application in an informal hearing, in which event the Commission shall schedule a formal hearing pursuant to

G.S. 97-83

on the employer’s application for termination of compensation. Compensation may be terminated or suspended by the employer following an informal hearing only if its application is approved. If the Commission was unable to reach a decision in the informal hearing, the employee’s compensation shall continue pending a decision by the Commission in the formal hearing. The Commission’s decision in the informal hearing is not binding in subsequent hearings.The employer or the employee may request a formal hearing pursuant to

G.S. 97-83

on the Commission’s decision approving or denying the employer’s application for termination of compensation. A formal hearing under G.S. 97-83 ordered or requested pursuant to this section shall be a hearing de novo on the employer’s application for termination or suspension of compensation and may be scheduled by the Commission on a preemptive basis.

At an informal hearing on the issue of termination or suspension of compensation, and at any subsequent hearing, the Commission may address related issues regarding the selection of medical providers or treatment under

G.S. 97-25

, subject to exhaustion of the dispute resolution procedures of a managed care organization pursuant to

G.S. 97-25

.2.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, ss. 3.6, 10.9.

§ 97-19.
Liability of principal contractors; certificate that subcontractor has complied with law; right to recover compensation of those who would have been liable; order of liability.

Any principal contractor, intermediate contractor, or subcontractor who shall sublet any contract for the performance of any work without obtaining from such subcontractor or obtaining from the Industrial Commission a certificate, issued by a workers’ compensation insurance carrier, or a certificate of compliance issued by the Department of Insurance to a self-insured subcontractor, stating that such subcontractor has complied with

G.S. 97-93

for a specified term, shall be liable, irrespective of whether such subcontractor has regularly in service fewer than three employees in the same business within this State, to the same extent as such subcontractor would be if he were subject to the provisions of this Article for the payment of compensation and other benefits under this Article on account of the injury or death of any employee of such subcontractor due to an accident arising out of and in the course of the performance of the work covered by such subcontract. If the principal contractor, intermediate contractor or subcontractor shall obtain such certificate at any time before subletting such contract to the subcontractor, he shall not thereafter be held liable to any employee of such subcontractor for compensation or other benefits under this Article and within the term specified by the certificate.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, any principal contractor, intermediate contractor, or subcontractor who shall sublet any contract for the performance of work shall not be held liable to any employee of such subcontractor if either (i) the subcontractor has a workers’ compensation insurance policy in compliance with

G.S. 97-93

in effect on the date of injury regardless of whether the principal contractor, intermediate contractor, or subcontractor failed to timely obtain a certificate from the subcontractor; or (ii) the policy expired or was cancelled prior to the date of injury provided the principal contractor, intermediate contractor, or subcontractor obtained a certificate at any time before subletting such contract to the subcontractor and was unaware of the expiration or cancellation.

Any principal contractor, intermediate contractor, or subcontractor paying compensation or other benefits under this Article, under the foregoing provisions of this section, may recover the amount so paid from any person, persons, or corporation who independently of such provision, would have been liable for the payment thereof.

Every claim filed with the Industrial Commission under this section shall be instituted against all parties liable for payment, and said Commission, in its award, shall fix the order in which said parties shall be exhausted, beginning with the immediate employer.

The principal or owner may insure any or all of his contractors and their employees in a blanket policy, and when so insured such contractor’s employees will be entitled to compensation benefits regardless of whether the relationship of employer and employee exists between the principal and the contractor.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 19; 1941, c. 358, s. 1; 1945, c. 766; 1973, c. 1291, s. 10; 1979, c. 247, s. 2; 1987, c. 729, s. 4; 1989, c. 637; 1991, c. 703, s. 7; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 10.6; 1995, c. 517, s. 36; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 555, s. 1; 2013-413, s. 13(c).

Cross References.

For definitions under this article, see

G.S. 97-2

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-413, s. 13(c), effective August 23, 2013, in the first paragraph, substituted “obtaining” for “requiring,” and “for a specified term” for “hereof,” in the first sentence, and in the second sentence, substituted “any time before subletting such contract to the subcontractor” for “the time of subletting such contract to subcontractor” and added “and within the term specified by the certificate” at the end; and added the present second paragraph. For applicability, see editor’s note.

Legal Periodicals.

For note as to rights of employees of subcontractors against owners and principal contractors, see 35 N.C.L. Rev. 569 (1957).

§ 97-19.1.
Truck, tractor, or truck tractor trailer driver’s status as employee or independent contractor.

An individual in the interstate or intrastate carrier industry who operates a truck, tractor, or truck tractor trailer licensed by a governmental motor vehicle regulatory agency may be an employee or an independent contractor under this Article dependent upon the application of the common law test for determining employment status.Any principal contractor, intermediate contractor, or subcontractor, irrespective of whether such contractor regularly employs three or more employees, who contracts with an individual in the interstate or intrastate carrier industry who operates a truck, tractor, or truck tractor trailer licensed by the United States Department of Transportation and who has not secured the payment of compensation in the manner provided for employers set forth in

G.S. 97-93

for himself personally and for his employees and subcontractors, if any, shall be liable as an employer under this Article for the payment of compensation and other benefits on account of the injury or death of the independent contractor and his employees or subcontractors due to an accident arising out of and in the course of the performance of the work covered by such contract.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a principal contractor, intermediate contractor, or subcontractor shall not be liable as an employer under this Article for the payment of compensation on account of the injury or death of the independent contractor if the principal contractor, intermediate contractor, or subcontractor (i) contracts with an independent contractor who is an individual licensed by the United States Department of Transportation and (ii) the independent contractor personally is operating the vehicle solely pursuant to that license.

The principal contractor, intermediate contractor, or subcontractor may insure any and all of his independent contractors and their employees or subcontractors in a blanket policy, and when insured, the independent contractors, subcontractors, and employees will be entitled to compensation benefits under the blanket policy.A principal contractor, intermediate contractor, or subcontractor may include in the governing contract with an independent contractor in the interstate or intrastate carrier industry who operates a truck, tractor, or truck tractor trailer licensed by a governmental motor vehicle regulatory agency an agreement for the independent contractor to reimburse the cost of covering that independent contractor under the principal contractor’s, intermediate contractor’s, or subcontractor’s coverage of his business.

History.

2003-235, s. 1; 2006-26, s. 1; 2006-259, s. 19.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-26, s. 1, effective June 26, 2006, added the subsection designations and added present subsection (b).

Session Laws 2006-259, s. 19, effective August 23, 2006, substituted “the United States Department of Transportation” for “a governmental motor vehicle regulatory agency” in the second paragraph of subsection (a); and in subsection (b), substituted “contractor who is an individual licensed by the United States Department of Transportation” for “contractor that is licensed by a governmental motor vehicle regulatory agency” in clause (i) and inserted “personally” and “solely” in clause (ii).

§ 97-20.
Priority of compensation claims against assets of employer.

All rights of compensation granted by this Article shall have the same preference or priority for the whole thereof against the assets of the employer as is allowed by law for any unpaid wages for labor.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 20.

§ 97-21.
Claims unassignable and exempt from taxes and debts; agreement of employee to contribute to premium or waive right to compensation void; unlawful deduction by employer.

No claim for compensation under this Article shall be assignable, and all compensation and claims therefor shall be exempt from all claims of creditors and from taxes.

No agreement by an employee to pay any portion of premium paid by his employer to a carrier or to contribute to a benefit fund or department maintained by such employer for the purpose of providing compensation or medical services and supplies as required by this Article shall be valid, and any employer who makes a deduction for such purpose from the pay of any employee entitled to the benefits of this Article shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished only by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00). No agreement by an employee to waive his right to compensation under this Chapter shall be valid.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 21; 1993, c. 539, s. 677; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

Legal Periodicals.

For discussion of this section, see 8 N.C.L. Rev. 477 (1930); 15 N.C.L. Rev. 286 (1937).

For article analyzing North Carolina’s exemptions law, see 18 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1025 (1982).

§ 97-22.
Notice of accident to employer.

Every injured employee or his representative shall immediately on the occurrence of an accident, or as soon thereafter as practicable, give or cause to be given to the employer a written notice of the accident, and the employee shall not be entitled to physician’s fees nor to any compensation which may have accrued under the terms of this Article prior to the giving of such notice, unless it can be shown that the employer, his agent or representative, had knowledge of the accident, or that the party required to give such notice had been prevented from doing so by reason of physical or mental incapacity, or the fraud or deceit of some third person; but no compensation shall be payable unless such written notice is given within 30 days after the occurrence of the accident or death, unless reasonable excuse is made to the satisfaction of the Industrial Commission for not giving such notice and the Commission is satisfied that the employer has not been prejudiced thereby.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 22.

Cross References.

As to minor dependent without guardian, see

G.S. 97-50

.

§ 97-23.
What notice is to contain; defects no bar; notice personally or by registered letter or certified mail.

The notice provided in the foregoing section [G.S. 97-22] shall state in ordinary language the name and address of the employee, the time, place, nature, and cause of the accident, and of the resulting injury or death; and shall be signed by the employee or by a person on his behalf, or, in the event of his death, by any one or more of his dependents, or by a person in their behalf.

No defect or inaccuracy in the notice shall be a bar to compensation unless the employer shall prove that his interest was prejudiced thereby, and then only to such extent as the prejudice.

Said notice shall be given personally to the employer or any of his agents upon whom a summons in civil action may be served under the laws of the State, or may be sent by registered letter or certified mail addressed to the employer at his last known residence or place of business.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 23; 1959, c. 863, s. 1.

§ 97-24.
Right to compensation barred after two years; destruction of records.

The right to compensation under this Article shall be forever barred unless (i) a claim or memorandum of agreement as provided in

G.S. 97-82

is filed with the Commission or the employee is paid compensation as provided under this Article within two years after the accident or (ii) a claim or memorandum of agreement as provided in

G.S. 97-82

is filed with the Commission within two years after the last payment of medical compensation when no other compensation has been paid and when the employer’s liability has not otherwise been established under this Article. The provisions of this subsection shall not limit the time otherwise allowed for the filing of a claim for compensation for occupational disease in

G.S. 97-58

, but in no event shall the time for filing a claim for compensation for occupational disease be less than the times provided herein for filing a claim for an injury by accident.

If any claim for compensation is hereafter made upon the theory that such claim or the injury upon which said claim is based is within the jurisdiction of the Industrial Commission under the provisions of this Article, and if the Commission, or the appellate courts on appeal, shall adjudge that such claim is not within the Article, the claimant, or if he dies, his personal representative, shall have one year after the rendition of a final judgment in the case within which to commence an action at law.

When all claims and reports required by this Article have been filed, and the cases and records of which they are a part have been closed by proper reports, receipts, awards or orders, these records, may after five years in the discretion of the Commission, with and by the authorization and approval of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, be destroyed by burning or otherwise.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 24; 1933, c. 449, s. 2; 1945, c. 766; 1955, c. 1026, s. 12; 1973, c. 476, s. 48; c. 1060, s. 1; 1991, c. 703, s. 8; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 3.4; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s).

Cross References.

As to corresponding limitations in cases of occupational diseases, see

G.S. 97-58

.

As to certain State law-enforcement officers, see

G.S. 143-166.16

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Department of Cultural Resources” in subsection (c).

Legal Periodicals.

For note on the range of compensable consequences of a work-related injury, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 583 (1971).

For article, “Statutes of Limitations in the Conflict of Laws,” see 52 N.C.L. Rev. 489 (1974).

For note on occupational disease under workers’ compensation statute, see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 288 (1980).

For a survey of 1996 developments in the law regarding prisoner rights, see 75 N.C.L. Rev. 2428 (1997).